Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.123

Collective bargaining agreements—Effect of termination—Application of section.

(1) After the termination date of a collective bargaining agreement, all of the terms and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement shall remain in effect until the effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from the termination date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement according to law.

(2) This section does not apply to provisions of a collective bargaining agreement which both parties agree to exclude from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and to provisions within the collective bargaining agreement with separate and specific termination dates.

(3) This section shall not apply to the following:

(a) Bargaining units covered by RCW 41.56.430 et seq. for fact-finding and interest arbitration;

(b) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 53.18 RCW; or

(c) Collective bargaining agreements authorized by chapter 54.04 RCW.

(4) This section shall not apply to collective bargaining agreements in effect or being bargained on July 23, 1989.

[ 1993 c 398 s 4; 1989 c 46 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1993 c 398: See note following RCW 41.56.030.